Utah statutes.
10-9a-601.   Enactment of subdivision ordinance.

(1)  The legislative body of a municipality may enact ordinances requiring that a subdivision plat comply with the provisions of the ordinance and this part before:

(a)  it may be filed or recorded in the county recorder's office; and

(b)  lots may be sold.

(2)  If the legislative body fails to enact a subdivision ordinance, the municipality may regulate subdivisions only to the extent provided in this part.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 254, 2005 General Session

